Tennessee, session 114, HB2189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-321(e)(2), is amended by
inserting the language ", in writing," immediately after the language "shall notify".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2189
012408
- 1 -